Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202279-3301
Act, how cited.

Sections 79-3301 to 79-3305 shall be known and may be cited as the Computer Science and Technology Education Act.

Laws 2022, LB1112, § 1.
July 21, 2022